Mississippi, session 2026, SB2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-115-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-115-85. * * * Until June 30, 2028,  Net proceeds generated by the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law, created pursuant to this chapter and deposited into the Lottery Proceeds Fund under Section 27-115-51(2), except as otherwise provided in this section, shall be paid into the State Highway Fund by warrant issued by the State Fiscal Officer upon requisition of the State Transportation Commission as needed to provide funds to repair, renovate and maintain highways and bridges of the state; however, funds paid into the State Highway Fund under this section shall be first used for matching federal funds authorized to the state pursuant to any federal highway infrastructure program implemented after September 1, 2018.  However, all such monies deposited into the Lottery Proceeds Fund over Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00) in a fiscal year shall be transferred into the Education Enhancement Fund for the purposes of funding the Early Childhood Learning Collaborative, the Classroom Supply Fund and/or other educational purposes. * * *  From and after July 1, 2028, the net proceeds shall be deposited into the Lottery Proceeds Fund and shall be transferred to the State General Fund, except for the amounts over Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00) which shall continue to be deposited in the Education Enhancement Fund as provided above. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.